src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! # Ingrian noun inflection
! ----
!! This file documents [affixes/nouns.lexc](../src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc)
]
!! This file documents the suffixes for noun inflection.

LEXICON N_YÖ-SG
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
! yö:yö
@U.POS.N@+Dial/Lauk+N:@U.POS.N@ N_YÖ-SG_01 ;

LEXICON N_YÖ-SG_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 SG-NOM   ; ! yö
 SG-PAR_tA   ; ! yötä
 SG-ILL_hV  ; ! yöhö
 Oblique-Singular ;


LEXICON N_MAA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
! maa (I)
+N: DER-tOin ; ! maatoin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N_MAA_01 ;

LEXICON N_MAA_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 SG-NOM   ; ! maa
 SG-PAR_tA   ; ! maata
 SG-ILL_hV  ; ! maaha
 Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
 PL-NOM   ; ! maat
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>jen	#   ; ! maijen
 PL-PAR_tA  ; ! maita
 PL-ILL_hV   ; ! maihe
 Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON N_PREESENS
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  preesens:preesens
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N_PREESENS_01 ;

LEXICON N_PREESENS_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 SG-NOM   ; ! preesens
:a SG-PAR_A  ; ! maita
:a SG-ILL_V   ; ! maihe
:a Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
:a PL-NOM   ; ! maat
:o PL-PAR_tA  ; ! maita
:o PL-ILL_hV   ; ! maihe
:o Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON N_GLASNOI
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ NMN_GLASNOI ;

LEXICON N_RISTI
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
! risti (II)
+N: DER-tOin ; ! ristitöin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-risti_01 ;

LEXICON N-risti_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
     SG-NOM   ; ! risti
!:%>%^LCns%^LVws SG-PAR_A   ; ! mattooa !Is this right
 SG-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! mattoa
 SG-ILL_V   ; ! mattoo
 Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
 lOi-Pl ;
: PL-PAR_A ; ! matoja
:i PL-PAR_A ; ! matoja
: PL-ILL_hV ; ! matoja
:%^NoGrad Oblique-Plural ; ! PL-PAR and PL-ILL needed 2012-10-31
:%>%^WCns PL-NOM   ; ! maot

LEXICON N_MATO
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  mato (II)
+N: DER-tOin ; ! maotoin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-mato_01 ;

LEXICON N-mato_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
     SG-NOM   ; ! mato
!:%>%^LCns%^LVws SG-PAR_A   ; ! mattooa !Is this right
 SG-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! mattoa
 SG-ILL_V   ; ! mattoo
 Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
 lOi-Pl ;
: PL-PAR_A ; ! matoja
:%^NoGrad Oblique-Plural ; ! PL-PAR and PL-ILL needed 2012-10-31
:%>%^WCns PL-NOM   ; ! maot

LEXICON N_KOIVU
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  koivu
+N: DER-tOin ; ! koivutoin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-koivu_01 ;
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@%^NoGrad Oblique-Plural_hV ;
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ PL-PAR_A ;

LEXICON N-koivu_01
   SG-NOM   ; ! koivu
 SG-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! koivua
 SG-ILL_V   ; ! koivuu
 Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
 lOi-Pl ;
:%^NoGrad Oblique-Plural ; ! 
 PL-NOM   ; ! koivut

LEXICON N_OSA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  forma osa (II-b)
+N: DER-tOin ; !
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-osa_01 ;

LEXICON N-osa_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 SG-NOM   ; ! osa
 SG-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! ossaa
 SG-ILL_V   ; ! ossaa
 Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
 PL-NOM   ; ! osat
Err/Sub:%>i%> PL-PAR_A   ; ! ossia
 PL-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! ossia
 PL-ILL_V   ; ! ossii
 Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON N_JOKI
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  joki:jok joki (II-c)
+N:e DER-tOin ; ! joetoin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-joki_01 ;

LEXICON N-joki_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
:i  SG-NOM   ; ! joki
:e SG-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! mattooa
:e SG-ILL_V   ; ! mattoo
:e  Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
:i lOi-Pl ;
:e       PL-NOM    ; ! joet
   PL-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! kumpia
:i       PL-PAR_A   ; ! kumpia
:       PL-PAR_A   ; ! kumpia
 Oblique-Plural_V ;

LEXICON N_LUMI
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  lumi (II-d)
+N:me DER-tOin ; !
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-lumi_01 ;

LEXICON N-lumi_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Sg+Nom:mi     #   ; ! lumi
:n SG-PAR_tA  ; ! lunta
+Sg+Ill:me%>%^LCnsV1	#   ; ! mattoo
:me  Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
+Pl:mi lOi-Pl ;
:me PL-NOM   ; ! lumet


LEXICON N_EMOI
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  emoi (III)
+N: DER-tOin ; !emotoin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-emoi_01 ;

LEXICON N-emoi_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Dial/Soik+Sg+Nom:i     #   ; ! emoi
+Dial/Lauk+Sg+Nom:     #   ; ! emoi
+Sg+Par:i%>%^LCns%^LVwsAÄ1	#   ; ! emmooja
+Sg+Ill:i%>%^LCnsV1	#   ; ! emoihe
:i Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
 lOi-Pl ;
+Pl+Nom:i%>%^WCnst     #   ; ! emoit

LEXICON N_JALKA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  the stem-final "a" is added here. jalka (IV)
+N+Der/tOin:a%>%^WCnst A_KALATOIN ; !
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-jalka_01 ;

LEXICON N-jalka_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
:a SG-NOM   ; ! jalka
:a SG-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! jalkaa
:a SG-ILL_V   ; ! jalkaa
:a  Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
:a       PL-NOM    ; ! jalat
:o 		 PL-PAR_A ; !  jalkoja, cf. kanoja
:o%>%^LCns	 PL-PAR_A ; ! jalkoja, cf. kannoja
+Pl+Ill:o%>i%>hV1	#   ; ! jalkoihe
:o Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON N_KANA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
! copied from N-jalka
! jalka (IV-a)
+N:a DER-tOin ; !
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-kana_01 ;

LEXICON N-kana_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
:a     SG-NOM   ; ! kana
:a SG-PAR_A-LCns ;
:a SG-ILL_V  ; ! jalkaa
:a  Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
:a   PL-NOM   ; ! kanat
:o	     PL-PAR_A  ; ! kanoja
! The next one is causing problems
! I can't get the i:j
:o  PL-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! kannoja
!+Pl+Par:o%>%^LCnsjAÄ1 K ; ! 2012-10-18
:o%>%^LCns   PL-ILL_blank   ; ! kannoi
:o Oblique-Plural ;

!! ## Three-syllable words

! This is incase there are 3-syllable issues
LEXICON N_MONIKKO
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 N_MATO ;

LEXICON N_TYTÄR
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  tytär:tyttä
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@%>%^WCnsr    SG-NOM        ;
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@%>%^WCnsr    SG-PAR_tA        ;
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@r N-tytär_01 ;

LEXICON N-tytär_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
:e     SG-ILL_V		;
:e Oblique-Singular ;
:e     PL-NOM		;
     PL-GEN		;
     PL-PAR_A		;
     PL-ILL_V		;
 Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON N_PATSAS
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  patsas:patsa
+N:%>V2 DER-tOin ; !
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-patsas_01 ;

LEXICON N-patsas_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Sg+Nom:%>%^WCnss K                ;
       :%>%^WCnss SG-PAR_tA        ;
       :%>V2      SG-ILL_sse       ;
       :h%>V2     SG-ILL_sse       ;
       :%>V2      Oblique-Singular ;
       :h%>V2     Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
       :%>V2      PL-NOM           ;
       :h%>V2     PL-NOM           ;
       :%>       PL-GEN           ;
       :%>V2      PL-PAR_tA        ;
       :h%>%^LCns PL-PAR_A         ;
       :%>V2      PL-ILL_sse       ;
       :h         PL-ILL_sse       ;
       :%>V2      Oblique-Plural   ;
       :hi        Oblique-Plural ;


LEXICON N_LÄHE
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  lähe:lähte
+N: DER-tOin ; !
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-lähe_01 ;
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@%>%^WCns     SG-NOM        ;
@U.POS.N@+Err/Orth+N:@U.POS.N@%>%^WCnsh     SG-NOM               ;

LEXICON N-lähe_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
:%>%^WCnst       SG-PAR_tA 	;
+Sg+Par:%>%^WCnsttAÄ1 K ;
:%>%^LCnsV2      SG-ILL_sse		;
:h%>V2      SG-ILL_sse		;
:%>%^LCnsV2 Oblique-Singular ;
:h%>V2 Oblique-Singular ;
:%>%^LCnsV2      PL-NOM		;
:h%>V2      PL-NOM		;
:%>%^LCns Oblique-Plural_sse ;
:h Oblique-Plural_sse ;
! Check 2012-10-12
:      PL-PAR_tA		;
:h%>%^LCns      PL-PAR_A		;
:h%>%^LCnsi      PL-ESS_Vn		;





LEXICON N_SLOVARI
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  from mato (II-e)
+N: DER-tOin ; ! slovaritoin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-slovari_01 ;

LEXICON N-slovari_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 SG-NOM   ; ! slovari
+Sg+Par:%>AÄ1	#   ; ! mattooa
+Sg+Ill:%>%^LVws	#   ; ! mattoo
 Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
: lOi-Pl ;
 PL-NOM   ; ! maot
:%^NoGrad Oblique-Plural ;
 PL-PAR_tA ;
 PL-ILL_hV ;


LEXICON N_NUMERO
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  numero:numero
+N: DER-tOin ; ! numerotoin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-numero_01 ;

LEXICON N-numero_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 SG-NOM   ; ! numero
 SG-PAR_A   ; ! mattooa
 SG-ILL_V   ; ! mattoo
 Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
: lOi-Pl ;
 PL-NOM   ; ! maot
:%^NoGrad Oblique-Plural ;
 PL-PAR_tA ;
 PL-ILL_hV ;


LEXICON N_VOKALA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  the stem-final "a" is added here  vokala (IV-b)
+N:a DER-tOin ; ! vokalatoin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-vokala_01 ;

LEXICON N-vokala_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
:a     SG-NOM   ; ! vokala
:a SG-PAR_A   ; ! jalkaa
:a SG-ILL_V   ; ! jalkaa
:a  Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
:a PL-NOM   ; ! vokalat
:o PL-PAR_A   ; ! vokaloja
:o PL-PAR_tA   ; ! praaviloita
:o PL-ILL_hV   ; ! jalkoihe
:o  Oblique-Plural ;


LEXICON N_HARAKKA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  harakka:harakk
!! This should operate using principles of ommeena
+N:AÄ1 DER-tOin ; !harakatoin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-harakka_01 ;

LEXICON N-harakka_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Sg+Nom:AÄ1     #   ; ! harakka
+Sg+Gen:AÄ1%^StretchSyll2%>%^WCnsn	#   ; ! harraakan
+Sg+Par:AÄ1AÄ1	#   ; ! mattooa
+Sg+Ill:AÄ1%>%^LCnsV1	#   ; ! mattoo
+Sg+Ine:AÄ1%>%^WCnsAÄ1s    #   ; ! maoos
+Sg+Ine:AÄ1%>%^WCnss    #   ; ! maoos
+Sg+Ela:AÄ1%>%^WCnsst    #   ; ! maost
+Sg+All:AÄ1%>%^WCnslle    #   ; ! maolle
+Sg+Ade:AÄ1%>%^WCnsl    #   ; ! maool
+Sg+Ade:AÄ1%>%^WCnsAÄ1l    #   ; ! maool
+Sg+Abl:AÄ1%>%^WCnslt    #   ; ! maolt
+Sg+Tra:AÄ1%>%^WCnsks    #   ; ! maoks
+Sg+Ess:AÄ1%>%^LCns%^LVwsnnAÄ1    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Exe:AÄ1%>%^LCns%^LVwsnt    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Com:AÄ1%>%^WCnsnkAÄ1    #   ; ! maanka
! Plural
:OÖ1  Oblique-Plural_hV ;
:OÖ1 PL-PAR_A ;
+Pl+Nom:AÄ1%^StretchSyll2%^WCnst     #   ; ! maot

LEXICON N_OMMEENA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  ommeena:omena
+N:AÄ1 DER-tOin ; !omenatoin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-ommeena_01 ;

LEXICON N-ommeena_01
+Sg+Nom:AÄ1%^StretchSyll2     #   ; ! mato
+Sg+Gen:AÄ1%^StretchSyll2n	#   ; ! maon
+Sg+Par:AÄ1AÄ1	#   ; ! mattooa
+Sg+Ill:AÄ1%>%^LCnsV1	#   ; ! mattoo
+Sg+Ine:AÄ1%>%^WCnsAÄ1s    #   ; ! maoos
+Sg+Ine:AÄ1%>%^WCnss    #   ; ! maoos
+Sg+Ela:AÄ1%>%^WCnsst    #   ; ! maost
+Sg+All:AÄ1%>%^WCnslle    #   ; ! maolle
+Sg+Ade:AÄ1%>%^WCnsl    #   ; ! maool
+Sg+Ade:AÄ1%>%^WCnsAÄ1l    #   ; ! maool
+Sg+Abl:AÄ1%>%^WCnslt    #   ; ! maolt
+Sg+Tra:AÄ1%>%^WCnsks    #   ; ! maoks
+Sg+Ess:AÄ1%>%^LCns%^LVwsnnAÄ1    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Exe:AÄ1%>%^LCns%^LVwsnt    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Com:AÄ1%>%^WCnsnkAÄ1    #   ; ! maanka
! Plural
:OÖ1 Oblique-Plural_hV ;
:OÖ1 PL-PAR_A ;
:OÖ1 PL-PAR_tA ;
:AÄ1%^StretchSyll2 PL-NOM   ; ! maot

LEXICON N_PUTTEELI
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  putteeli:puteli
! 
+N: DER-tOin ; !putelitoin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-putteeli_01 ;

LEXICON N-putteeli_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Sg+Nom:%^StretchSyll2     #   ; ! mato
+Sg+Gen:%^StretchSyll2n	#   ; ! maon
+Sg+Par:AÄ1	#   ; ! mattooa
+Sg+Ill:i	#   ; ! mattoo
+Sg+Ine:%^StretchSyll2is    #   ; ! maoos
+Sg+Ine:%^StretchSyll2s    #   ; ! maoos
+Sg+Ela:%^StretchSyll2st    #   ; ! maost
+Sg+All:%^StretchSyll2lle    #   ; ! maolle
+Sg+Ade:%^StretchSyll2l    #   ; ! maool
+Sg+Abl:%^StretchSyll2lt    #   ; ! maolt
+Sg+Tra:%^StretchSyll2ks    #   ; ! maoks
+Sg+Ess:%>%^LCns%^LVwsnnAÄ1    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Exe:%>%^LCns%^LVwsnt    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Com:%>%^WCnsnkAÄ1    #   ; ! maanka
! Plural
:%^StretchSyll2  lOi-Pl ; ! putteeliloin
+Pl+Nom:%^StretchSyll2t     #   ; ! maot


LEXICON N_LEIKKUU
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  leikkuu, kiukkaa, lämmää (VI)
+N: DER-tOin ; ! leikkuutoin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-leikkuu_01 ;

LEXICON N-leikkuu_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Sg+Nom:     #   ; ! mato
+Sg+Par:%>tAÄ1	#   ; ! ?lämmäätä vs 
+Sg+Ill:%>sse	#   ; ! mattoo
 Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
 lOi-Pl ;
+Pl+Nom:%>t     #   ; ! maot

LEXICON N_ASSIA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  assia:assi (VII)
+N:AÄ1 DER-tOin ; !
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-assia_01 ;

LEXICON N-assia_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
:AÄ1 N-assia_01-Sg ;
:OÖ1  Oblique-Plural ;
:OÖ1 PL-PAR_A ;
:OÖ1 PL-ILL_hV ;

LEXICON N-assia_01-Sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 SG-NOM	    ; ! assia
 SG-PAR_A   ; ! assiaa
 SG-ILL_V   ; ! assiaa
 Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
 PL-NOM  ; ! assiat

LEXICON N_PESÄ
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  VCV
! pesä:pesä
+N: DER-tOin ; !pesätöin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-pesä_01 ;

LEXICON N-pesä_01
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 SG-NOM   ; ! pesä
 SG-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! pessää
 SG-ILL_V   ; ! pessää
 Oblique-Singular ;
! Plural
 PL-NOM   ; ! pesät
 PL-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! pessiä
 PL-ILL_V   ; ! pessii
 Oblique-Plural ;

LEXICON N_TÄHKÄ
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  VCCV,  tähkä (VIII)
+N: DER-tOin ; !tähätöin
@U.POS.N@+N:@U.POS.N@ N-tähkä_01 ;
